Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF2142.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 5655YH (2) 91 ak/ko H.F. 2142 Section 1. NEW SECTION . 249A.42B Limitations on activities 1 related to paid claims ââ resubmission. 2 1. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, 3 any post-payment review of Medicaid provider claims paid under 4 either Medicaid fee-for-service or managed care administration 5 that do not involve fraud or misrepresentation shall be limited 6 to a review of only those claims for which no more than twelve 7 months have elapsed since the date of payment of the claim. 8 2. Additionally, any provider overpayment identified for 9 which twelve months or more have elapsed since the date of 10 payment of the claim shall not be subject to repayment or to 11 offset against future reimbursement of claims by the provider. 12 3. The limitations specified in this section shall not apply 13 to retroactive Medicaid cost settlements or rate changes based 14 on a Medicaid or Medicare cost report. 15 4. Any improper payment identified through a review may be 16 resubmitted by the provider as a claims adjustment. 17 Sec. 2. EFFECTIVE DATE. This Act, being deemed of immediate 18 importance, takes effect upon enactment. 19